Arkansas statutes. Title 22 Public Property
Chapter 3 Public Buildings and Other Facilities
22-3-2004. Standards for major facility or major renovation.

(a)

The following minimum standards apply to a major facility:

(1)

A major facility of a public agency or an institution of higher education shall consider a life-cycle cost analysis and be designed, constructed, and certified in accordance with the Performance Rating Method of Appendix G of the American Society of Heating, Refrigerating, and Air-Conditioning Engineers, Standard 90.1-2013, as it existed on January 1, 2018;

(2)

Subdivision (a)(1) of this section applies to a major facility project that has not entered the schematic design phase on or before June 30, 2019; and

(3)

An exception or a special standard for a specific type of building or building facility that is found in the American Society of Heating, Refrigerating, and Air-Conditioning Engineers, Standard 90.1-2013, is included in the American Society of Heating, Refrigerating, and Air-Conditioning Engineers, Standard 90.1-2013, under subdivision (a)(1) of this section.

(b)(1)

A major renovation of a public agency or an institution of higher education shall consider a life-cycle cost analysis and be certified in accordance with the Performance Rating Method of Appendix G of the American Society of Heating, Refrigerating, and Air-Conditioning Engineers, Standard 90.1-2013, as it existed on January 1, 2018.

(2)

Subdivision (b)(1) of this section applies to a major renovation that has not entered the schematic design phase on or before June 30, 2019.

(c)

For new construction under either subsection (a) or subsection (b) of this section:

(1)

The indoor water system shall be designed and constructed to use at least twenty percent (20%) less potable water than the indoor water use baseline calculated for the building after satisfying the fixture performance requirement, if any, under the Arkansas Plumbing Code; and

(2)

Outdoor potable water or harvested groundwater consumption shall use water-use-efficient landscape materials and irrigation strategies, including without limitation water reuse and recycling, to reduce conventional consumption by at least fifty percent (50%) of the water that would have been consumed otherwise.

(d)

If the Arkansas Energy Office of the Division of Environmental Quality or the institution of higher education determines the American Society of Heating, Refrigerating, and Air-Conditioning Engineers, Standard 90.1-2013 is not practicable for a major facility or major renovation, the office or the institution of higher education shall determine a practicable alternative standard for the design and construction for that major facility or major renovation.

(e)

To verify the performance of a building component or system and ensure that design requirements are met upon completion of construction, building or system commissioning practices that are tailored to the size and complexity of the building and its system components shall be employed.

(f)

To measure and verify a major facility's performance under this section's standards:

(1)

A building-level owner's meter for electricity, natural gas, fuel oil, and water shall be installed in accordance with the guidelines issued by the United States Department of Energy under section 103 of the Energy Policy Act of 2005, Pub. L. No. 109-58; and

(2)(A)

The public agency or institution of higher education and the building designers shall:

(i)

Compare metered data from the first twelve (12) months of the building's operation with the energy design target; and

(ii)

Report the performance results of that comparison to the office or to the governing board of the institution of higher education.

(B)

If the report under subdivision (f)(2)(A)(ii) of this section shows that the building's average energy or water consumption over the one-year period after the date of beneficial occupancy is more than the baseline consumption determined in accordance with the Performance Rating Method of Appendix G of the American Society of Heating, Refrigerating, and Air-Conditioning Engineers, Standard 90.1-2013, as it existed on January 1, 2018, the designer, the owner public agency or the owner institution of higher education, the contractor, the contract manager at risk, and the commissioning agent shall:

(i)

Investigate;

(ii)

Determine the cause for the failure to achieve this section's performance standards; and

(iii)

Recommend corrections or modifications to meet this section's performance standards.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1494, § 1; 2011, No. 803, §§ 2-4; 2019, No. 674, §§ 4-6.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment made no changes to the section.

The 2019 amendment, in (a)(1), inserted “consider a life-cycle cost analysis and” and deleted “to at least ten percent (10%) reduction below the baseline energy consumption determined” following “certified”; substituted “Standard 90.1-2013” for “Standard 90.1-2007” throughout the section; substituted “January 1, 2018” for “January 1, 2009” in (a)(1), (b)(1), and the introductory language of (f)(2)(B); and substituted “on or before June 30, 2019” for “before July 31, 2009” in (a)(2) and (b)(2).

22-3-2005. Purchase of constructed or renovated building.

(a)

A public agency shall not purchase a building that:

(1)

Did not meet the design and construction standards that were applicable for a comparable building at the time of its construction; or

(2)

Had a major renovation that did not meet the standard for energy and water efficiency that was applicable for a comparable building at the time of the major renovation.

(b)

This section does not apply to:

(1)

The purchase of a building that has historic, architectural, or cultural significance;

(2)

A building that is acquired by devise or gift; or

(3)

A building that is purchased for demolition.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1494, § 1.

22-3-2006. Program to manage energy usage of public agencies.

(a)

The Arkansas Energy Office of the Division of Environmental Quality shall:

(1)

Develop an energy program to manage energy, water, and other utility uses for public agencies that will reduce total aggregate energy consumption per gross square foot for all existing applicable public agency buildings if the savings can be justified by a life-cycle cost analysis;

(2)

Update this program annually; and

(3)

Recommend public agency energy consumption reduction goals every five (5) years.

(b)

To implement its program, the office shall to the extent funds are available and appropriated:

(1)

Develop and implement policies, procedures, and standards to ensure that a public agency's purchasing practices:

(A)

Improve the efficiency of energy, water, and other utility uses; and

(B)

Consider the cost of the product over its economic life;

(2)

Adopt and implement building energy design guidelines for public agencies that include without limitation:

(A)

Energy-use goals and standards;

(B)

Economic assumptions for life-cycle cost analysis; and

(C)

Other criteria for building systems and technologies;

(3)

Identify and recommend energy conservation maintenance and operating procedures that:

(A)

Are designed to reduce energy consumption within the public facility; and

(B)

Require no significant expenditure of funds;

(4)

Require the maximum interchangeability and compatibility of equipment components when energy management equipment is proposed for any facility of a public agency; and

(5)

Offer substantial recognition to a public agency that acts in a manner that furthers the program and goals under this section.

(c)

The office may adopt architectural and engineering standards to implement this section.

(d)

A public agency shall:

(1)

Submit annually by October 31 to the office a written report of the public agency's utility consumption and costs by fuel to which the office shall respond with a recommendation annually by June 30;

(2)

Complete construction and renovation of a facility in a manner that:

(A)

Furthers the program and goals under this section; and

(B)

Ensures the use of life-cycle cost analyses and practices to conserve energy, water, and other utilities; and

(3)

Comply with the office's program under subdivision (b)(1) of this section, to the extent funds are available and appropriated.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1494, § 1; 2011, No. 803, §§ 5, 6; 2017, No. 271, §§ 17-19; 2019, No. 674, § 7; 2019, No. 910, §§ 3229-3231.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment added “to the extent funds are available” in the introductory language of (b); deleted “to the extent funds are available” at the end of (b)(5)(A); rewrote (b)(5)(B); and substituted “October 31” for “April 1” in (d)(3).

The 2017 amendment inserted “of the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in the introductory language of (a) and (b), and in (c).

The 2019 amendment by No. 674, in (a)(1), inserted “aggregate”, and substituted “applicable public agency buildings” for “state buildings by twenty percent (20%) by 2014 and thirty percent (30%) by 2017 based on energy consumption for the 2007-2008 fiscal year”; inserted (a)(3); in the introductory language of (b), substituted “program” for “plan”, and inserted “and appropriated”; redesignated (b)(2)(A) as (2); deleted former (b)(2)(B); rewrote (b)(5); deleted former (d)(1) and (d)(2) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; inserted “to which the Arkansas Energy Office shall respond with a recommendation annually by June 30” in (d)(1); substituted “Complete” for “Carry out the” in the introductory language of (d)(2); inserted “program and” in (d)(2)(A); and in (d)(3), substituted “Comply with” for “Implement” and “program” for “recommendation made”, and added “and appropriated”.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Arkansas Energy Office of the Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Energy Office of the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in the introductory language of (a), the introductory language of (b), and (c).

22-3-2007. Application to historic and unique buildings.

This subchapter does not apply if the implementation of a measure to conserve energy, water, or other utility use conflicts with the requirements for:

(1)

A property to be eligible for, nominated to, or entered on the National Register of Historic Places under the National Historic Preservation Act of 1966, Pub. L. No. 89-665;

(2)

An historic building located within an historic district;

(3)

An historic building listed, owned, or under the jurisdiction of an historic properties commission; or

(4)

A building that the Arkansas Energy Office of the Division of Environmental Quality has exempted from this subchapter because of its unique architectural characteristics or usage.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1494, § 1; 2017, No. 271, § 20; 2019, No. 910, § 3232.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment inserted “of the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (4).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (4).

22-3-2008. Advisory committee for the Arkansas Energy Office.

(a)(1)

The Director of the Division of Environmental Quality or his or her designee may create and recommend members for a sustainable, energy-efficient building advisory committee composed of:

(A)

Representatives from the design and construction industry who are involved in public works contracting;

(B)

Persons from public agencies who are responsible for overseeing public works projects or for developing energy efficiency programs and policies; and

(C)

Other persons that the director or his or her designee considers to have useful information.

(2)(A)

The director shall approve the creation and membership recommendations under this section.

(B)

The committee members shall serve at the pleasure of the director.

(b)

The committee shall provide advice on the implementation of this subchapter, including without limitation recommendations regarding:

(1)

An education and training process for persons who are involved in the implementation of this subchapter;

(2)

An ongoing evaluation or feedback process to help the Arkansas Energy Office of the Division of Environmental Quality to implement this section; and

(3)

Water-deficiency requirements and energy-efficiency requirements.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1494, § 1; 2017, No. 271, § 21; 2019, No. 674, § 8; 2019, No. 910, § 3233.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment substituted “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Economic Development Commission” in the section heading; in the introductory language of (a)(1),
inserted “of the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” and “and recommend members for”; in (a)(1)(C), substituted “Director of the Arkansas Energy Office of the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” for “director”; and rewrote (a)(2).

The 2019 amendment by No. 674 deleted “of the Arkansas Energy Office” following “Director” in the introductory language of (a)(1) and (a)(1)(C); substituted “or his or her designee may” for “shall” in the introductory language of (a)(1); and inserted “or his or her designee” in (a)(1)(C).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “of the Division of Environmental Quality” for “of the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” following “Arkansas Energy Office” in the section heading and the introductory language of (a)(1); substituted “Director of the Division of Environmental Quality” for “Director of the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a)(2)(A) and (a)(2)(B); and deleted “of the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” following “Arkansas Energy Office” in (a)(1)(C) and (b)(2).

22-3-2009. Rules and administration.

(a)

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall promulgate rules for the implementation of operation and maintenance energy conservation measures in public buildings.

(b)

The Arkansas Energy Office of the Division of Environmental Quality shall:

(1)

Develop or revise the architectural and engineering standards, to the extent funds are available and appropriated, to provide assistance in determining:

(A)

The energy conservation measures that are best suited to the unique characteristics of each building; and

(B)

The specifications for the energy conservation measures under this subchapter; and

(2)

Develop and adopt guidelines for the development of education and training requirements for the various personnel that may be involved in a major facility or a major renovation under this subchapter.

(c)

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission may promulgate rules to implement this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1494, § 1; 2017, No. 271, § 22; 2019, No. 315, §§ 2363, 2364; 2019, No. 674, § 9; 2019, No. 910, § 3234.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment substituted “Regulations and administration” for “Rules” in the section heading; and rewrote the section.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (a) and (c).

The 2019 amendment by No. 674 inserted “to the extent funds are available and appropriated” in the introductory language of (b)(1).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in the introductory language of (b).

22-3-2010. Performance review — Report.

(a)

To the extent that funds are available and appropriated, the Arkansas Energy Office of the Division of Environmental Quality shall conduct a performance review of the Sustainable Energy-Efficient Buildings Program that includes at least the following:

(1)

An identification of the costs of implementing energy-efficient and water-efficient building standards in the design and construction of a major facility or major renovation;

(2)

An identification of the operating savings attributable to the implementation of energy-efficient and water-efficient building standards, including without limitation savings in energy, water, utility, and maintenance costs; and

(3)

An evaluation of the effectiveness of the application of the standards under this subchapter.

(b)

No later than December 1, 2010, and each year thereafter, the office shall report to the cochairs of the Legislative Council its:

(1)

Findings under subsection (a) of this section; and

(2)

Recommended changes, if any.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1494, § 1; 2017, No. 271, § 23; 2019, No. 256, § 7; 2019, No. 674, § 10; 2019, No. 910, § 3235.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment inserted “of the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a).

The 2019 amendment by No. 256 deleted “and each institution of higher education” following “Arkansas Energy Office” in the introductory language of (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 674, in the introductory of (a), added “To the extent that funds are available and appropriated”, and deleted “to the extent funds are available” preceding “shall”; deleted former (a)(3); and redesignated former (a)(4) as (a)(3).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in the introductory language of (a).

22-3-2011. Applicability.

(a)

The boards of trustees for the University of Arkansas, Arkansas State University, the University of Central Arkansas, Henderson State University, Arkansas Tech University, and Southern Arkansas University are exempt from the provisions of this subchapter if those institutions develop policies and procedures to meet the:

(1)

Specific performance criteria and goals for a major facility or major renovation; and

(2)

Requirements of §22-3-2006(d)(1).

(b)(1)

The board of trustees of any institution of higher education that is not included under subsection (a) of this section may be exempted from the provisions of this subchapter by the Division of Higher Education.

(2)

Before granting an exemption to a board of trustees of an institution of higher education under subdivision (b)(1) of this section, the Division of Higher Education shall review and approve the policies and procedures to meet the:

(A)

Specific performance criteria and goals for a major facility or major renovation; and

(B)

Requirements of §22-3-2006(d)(1).

(c)

This subchapter does not:

(1)

Preclude an institution of higher education from adopting the policies and technical guidelines for a major facility or a major renovation that are established by the Arkansas Energy Office of the Division of Environmental Quality under §22-3-2003(b)(1); or

(2)

Affect the processes or exemptions under §22-6-601.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1494, § 1; 2017, No. 271, § 24; 2019, No. 674, § 11; 2019, No. 910, §§ 3236, 3237.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment inserted “of the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (c)(1).

The 2019 amendment by No. 674 redesignated part of (a) as (a)(1); added (a)(2); redesignated part of (b)(2) as (b)(2)(A); and added (b)(2)(B).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Higher Education” for “Department of Higher Education” in (b)(1); substituted “Division of Higher Education” for “department” in the introductory language of (b)(2); and substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (c)(1).

22-3-1225. Prison Construction Trust Fund.